Missouri, session 2026, HB1815.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 394, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 394.400, to read as follows:
394.400. 1. In any city with more than ten thousand but fewer than eleven
thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than thirty
thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants, any new structure, as such
term is defined in section 394.315, shall have the option to connect to any electrical
service available to such structure, including any:
(1) Electrical corporation, as defined in section 386.020;
(2) Municipally owned or operated electric power system, as defined in section
91.025; or
(3) Rural electric cooperative organized and operating under the provisions of
chapter 394.
2. Nothing in this section shall require any electric service provider to enter into
a territorial agreement under section 394.312.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.